Illinois, session 104th, SB3038.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Promotion Act is amended by 5changing Section 8a as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 665/8a)  (from Ch. 127, par. 200-28a)7    Sec. 8a. Tourism grants and loans. 8    (1) The Department is authorized to make grants and loans, 9subject to appropriations by the General Assembly for this 10purpose from the Tourism Promotion Fund, to counties, 11municipalities, other units of local government, local 12promotion groups, not-for-profit organizations, or for-profit 13businesses for the development or improvement of tourism 14attractions in Illinois. Individual grants and loans shall not 15exceed $1,000,000 and shall not exceed 50% of the entire 16amount of the actual expenditures for the development or 17improvement of a tourist attraction. Agreements for loans made 18by the Department pursuant to this subsection may contain 19provisions regarding term, interest rate, security as may be 20required by the Department and any other provisions the 21Department may require to protect the State's interest.22    (2) From appropriations to the Department from the State 23CURE fund for this purpose, the Department shall establish   SB3038- 2 -LRB104 18782 HLH 32225 b1Tourism Attraction grants for purposes outlined in subsection 2(1). Grants under this subsection shall not exceed $1,000,000 3but may exceed 50% of the entire amount of the actual 4expenditure for the development or improvement of a tourist 5attraction, including, but not limited to, festivals. 6Expenditures of such funds shall be in accordance with the 7permitted purposes under Section 9901 of the American Rescue 8Plan Act of 2021 and all related federal guidance.9    (3) Subject to appropriation, the Department is authorized 10to issue competitive grants with initial terms of up to 5 years 11for the purpose of administering an incentive program that 12will attract or retain conventions, meetings, sporting events, 13and trade shows in Illinois with the goal of increasing 14business or leisure travel. 15    (4) Beginning July 1, 2026, subject to appropriation, the 16Department is authorized to issue competitive grants with 17initial terms of 10 years for the purpose of administering an 18incentive program that will attract or retain conventions, 19meetings, sporting events, and trade shows in Illinois with 20the goal of increasing business or leisure travel to and 21within the State. The Department shall provide for a new grant 22award of available funds under this item (4) once every 3 23years. An event shall not be considered ineligible for grant 24funding under this item (4) if multiple Illinois destinations 25are in competition for the same event. Room night credits that 26are actualized, contracted, revenue-generating group room   SB3038- 3 -LRB104 18782 HLH 32225 b1nights directly sourced by the grantee must exceed 200 for 2outside of the City of Chicago and 5,000 within the City of 3Chicago. The maximum amount awarded to entities outside the 4City of Chicago is $1,000,000 in each grant award cycle. To be 5eligible for grant funding under this item (4), an applicant 6must be a certified convention and visitors bureau, a unit of 7local government, a local promotion group, a not-for-profit 8organization, a for-profit organization, or a convention 9center authority. If applicants are in a service area covered 10by a certified convention and visitors bureau, the application 11must include a letter of support from the certified convention 12and visitors bureau. Grant funding under this item (4) may be 13awarded to a joint effort between a certified convention and 14visitors bureau and another eligible entity. If the applicant 15intends to implement its program jointly with the certified 16convention and visitors bureau, the application should submit 17a letter of intent from the bureau providing details of the 18joint effort. 19(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-287, eff. 8-6-21; 20102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23.) 21    Section 10. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 22Sections 5.1038 and 6z-149 as follows: 23    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)24    Sec. 5.1038. The Tourism Incentive Grant Program Fund.   SB3038- 4 -LRB104 18782 HLH 32225 b1    (30 ILCS 105/6z-149 new)2    Sec. 6z-149. Tourism Incentive Grant Program Fund; 3creation.4    (a) The Tourism Incentive Grant Program Fund is created as 5a special fund in the State treasury. Money in the Tourism 6Incentive Grant Program Fund shall be used, subject to 7appropriation, for grants as provided in item (4) of Section 88a of the Illinois Promotion Act. 9    (b) On July 1, 2026, and every July 1 thereafter, or as 10soon thereafter as practical, the State Comptroller shall 11direct and the State Treasurer shall transfer the sum of 12$5,000,000 from the General Revenue Fund to the Tourism 13Incentive Grant Program Fund.  14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.